Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6010
Risk-based capital instructions, defined.

Risk-based capital instructions means the risk-based capital report, including risk-based capital instructions adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, as such instructions may be amended by the association from time to time in accordance with the procedures adopted by the association.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 22;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 15.